Florida, session 2026, HB45.
Be It Enacted by the Legislature of the State of Florida:
25
Page 1 of 16
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb45-00

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
HB 45 2026
26 Section 1. Subsection (2) of section 514.011, Florida
27 Statutes, is amended to read:
28 514.011 Definitions.—As used in this chapter:
29 (2) "Public swimming pool" or "public pool" means a
30 watertight structure of concrete, masonry, or other approved
31 materials which is located either indoors or outdoors, used for
32 bathing or swimming by humans, and filled with a filtered and
33 disinfected water supply, together with buildings,
34 appurtenances, and equipment used in connection therewith. A
35 public swimming pool or public pool shall mean a conventional
36 pool, spa-type pool, wading pool, special purpose pool, spray
37 pool, splash pad, or water recreation attraction, to which
38 admission may be gained with or without payment of a fee and
39 includes, but is not limited to, pools operated by or serving
40 camps, churches, cities, counties, child care facilities day
41 care centers, group home facilities for eight or more clients,
42 health spas, institutions, parks, state agencies, schools,
43 subdivisions, or the cooperative living-type projects of five or
44 more living units, such as apartments, boardinghouses, hotels,
45 mobile home parks, motels, recreational vehicle parks, and
46 townhouses.
47 Section 2. Paragraph (d) of subsection (1) of section
48 775.215, Florida Statutes, is redesignated as paragraph (f),
49 paragraph (a) of subsection (2) and paragraph (a) of subsection
50 (3) are amended, and new paragraphs (d) and (e) are added to
Page 2 of 16
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb45-00

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
HB 45 2026
51 subsection (1) of that section, to read:
52 775.215 Residency restriction for persons convicted of
53 certain sex offenses.—
54 (1) As used in this section, the term:
55 (d) "Public bathing place" has the same meaning as
56 provided in s. 514.011(4).
57 (e) "Public swimming pool" has the same meaning as
58 provided in s. 514.011(2).
59 (2)(a) A person who has been convicted of a violation of
60 s. 794.011, s. 800.04, s. 827.071, s. 847.0135(5), or s.
61 847.0145, regardless of whether adjudication has been withheld,
62 in which the victim of the offense was less than 16 years of
63 age, may not reside within 1,000 feet of any school, child care
64 facility, park, public swimming pool, public bathing place, or
65 playground. However, a person does not violate this subsection
66 and may not be forced to relocate if he or she is living in a
67 residence that meets the requirements of this subsection and a
68 school, child care facility, park, public swimming pool, public
69 bathing place, or playground is subsequently established within
70 1,000 feet of his or her residence.
71 (3)(a) A person who has been convicted of an offense in
72 another jurisdiction that is similar to a violation of s.
73 794.011, s. 800.04, s. 827.071, s. 847.0135(5), or s. 847.0145,
74 regardless of whether adjudication has been withheld, in which
75 the victim of the offense was less than 16 years of age, may not
Page 3 of 16
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb45-00

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
HB 45 2026
76 reside within 1,000 feet of any school, child care facility,
77 park, public swimming pool, public bathing place, or playground.
78 However, a person does not violate this subsection and may not
79 be forced to relocate if he or she is living in a residence that
80 meets the requirements of this subsection and a school, child
81 care facility, park, public swimming pool, public bathing place,
82 or playground is subsequently established within 1,000 feet of
83 his or her residence.
84 Section 3. Section 943.04351, Florida Statutes, is amended
85 to read:
86 943.04351 Search of registration information regarding
87 sexual predators and sexual offenders required before
88 appointment or employment.—A state agency or governmental
89 subdivision, before making any decision to appoint or employ a
90 person to work, whether for compensation or as a volunteer, at
91 any park, playground, public swimming pool, public bathing
92 place, child care facility day care center, or other place where
93 children regularly congregate, must conduct a search of that
94 person's name or other identifying information against the
95 registration information regarding sexual predators and sexual
96 offenders through the Dru Sjodin National Sexual Offender Public
97 Website maintained by the United States Department of Justice.
98 If for any reason that site is not available, a search of the
99 registration information regarding sexual predators and sexual
100 offenders maintained by the Department of Law Enforcement under
Page 4 of 16
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb45-00

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
HB 45 2026
101 s. 943.043 shall be performed. This section does not apply to
102 those positions or appointments within a state agency or
103 governmental subdivision for which a state and national criminal
104 history background check is conducted.
105 Section 4. Subsections (10) through (15) of section
106 947.005, Florida Statutes, are renumbered as subsections (12)
107 through (17), respectively, and new subsections (10) and (11)
108 are added that section, to read:
109 947.005 Definitions.—As used in this chapter, unless the
110 context clearly indicates otherwise:
111 (10) "Public bathing place" has the same meaning as
112 provided in s. 514.011(4).
113 (11) "Public swimming pool" has the same meaning as
114 provided in s. 514.011(2).
115 Section 5. Paragraph (a) of subsection (7) and paragraph
116 (a) of subsection (12) of section 947.1405, Florida Statutes,
117 are amended to read:
118 947.1405 Conditional release program.—
119 (7)(a) Any inmate who is convicted of a crime committed on
120 or after October 1, 1995, or who has been previously convicted
121 of a crime committed on or after October 1, 1995, in violation
122 of chapter 794, s. 800.04, s. 827.071, s. 847.0135(5), or s.
123 847.0145, and is subject to conditional release supervision,
124 shall have, in addition to any other conditions imposed, the
125 following special conditions imposed by the commission:
Page 5 of 16
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb45-00

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
HB 45 2026
126 1. A mandatory curfew from 10 p.m. to 6 a.m. The
127 commission may designate another 8-hour period if the offender's
128 employment precludes the above specified time, and such
129 alternative is recommended by the Department of Corrections. If
130 the commission determines that imposing a curfew would endanger
131 the victim, the commission may consider alternative sanctions.
132 2. If the victim was under the age of 18, a prohibition on
133 living within 1,000 feet of a school, child care facility, park,
134 playground, public swimming pool, public bathing place,
135 designated public school bus stop, or other place where children
136 regularly congregate. A releasee who is subject to this
137 subparagraph may not relocate to a residence that is within
138 1,000 feet of a public school bus stop. Beginning October 1,
139 2004, the commission or the department may not approve a
140 residence that is located within 1,000 feet of a school, child
141 care facility, park, playground, public swimming pool, public
142 bathing place, designated school bus stop, or other place where
143 children regularly congregate for any releasee who is subject to
144 this subparagraph. On October 1, 2004, the department shall
145 notify each affected school district of the location of the
146 residence of a releasee 30 days prior to release and thereafter,
147 if the releasee relocates to a new residence, shall notify any
148 affected school district of the residence of the releasee within
149 30 days after relocation. If, on October 1, 2004, any public
150 school bus stop is located within 1,000 feet of the existing
Page 6 of 16
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb45-00

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
HB 45 2026
151 residence of such releasee, the district school board shall
152 relocate that school bus stop. Beginning October 1, 2004, a
153 district school board may not establish or relocate a public
154 school bus stop within 1,000 feet of the residence of a releasee
155 who is subject to this subparagraph. The failure of the district
156 school board to comply with this subparagraph shall not result
157 in a violation of conditional release supervision. A releasee
158 who is subject to this subparagraph may not be forced to
159 relocate and does not violate his or her conditional release
160 supervision if he or she is living in a residence that meets the
161 requirements of this subparagraph and a school, child care
162 facility, park, playground, public swimming pool, public bathing
163 place, designated public school bus stop, or other place where
164 children regularly congregate is subsequently established within
165 1,000 feet of his or her residence.
166 3. Active participation in and successful completion of a
167 sex offender treatment program with qualified practitioners
168 specifically trained to treat sex offenders, at the releasee's
169 own expense. If a qualified practitioner is not available within
170 a 50-mile radius of the releasee's residence, the offender shall
171 participate in other appropriate therapy.
172 4. A prohibition on any contact with the victim, directly
173 or indirectly, including through a third person, unless approved
174 by the victim, a qualified practitioner in the sexual offender
175 treatment program, and the sentencing court.
Page 7 of 16
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb45-00

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
HB 45 2026
176 5. If the victim was under the age of 18, a prohibition
177 against contact with children under the age of 18 without review
178 and approval by the commission. The commission may approve
179 supervised contact with a child under the age of 18 if the
180 approval is based upon a recommendation for contact issued by a
181 qualified practitioner who is basing the recommendation on a
182 risk assessment. Further, the sex offender must be currently
183 enrolled in or have successfully completed a sex offender
184 therapy program. The commission may not grant supervised contact
185 with a child if the contact is not recommended by a qualified
186 practitioner and may deny supervised contact with a child at any
187 time. When considering whether to approve supervised contact
188 with a child, the commission must review and consider the
189 following:
190 a. A risk assessment completed by a qualified
191 practitioner. The qualified practitioner must prepare a written
192 report that must include the findings of the assessment and
193 address each of the following components:
194 (I) The sex offender's current legal status;
195 (II) The sex offender's history of adult charges with
196 apparent sexual motivation;
197 (III) The sex offender's history of adult charges without
198 apparent sexual motivation;
199 (IV) The sex offender's history of juvenile charges,
200 whenever available;
Page 8 of 16
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb45-00

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
HB 45 2026
201 (V) The sex offender's offender treatment history,
202 including a consultation from the sex offender's treating, or
203 most recent treating, therapist;
204 (VI) The sex offender's current mental status;
205 (VII) The sex offender's mental health and substance abuse
206 history as provided by the Department of Corrections;
207 (VIII) The sex offender's personal, social, educational,
208 and work history;
209 (IX) The results of current psychological testing of the
210 sex offender if determined necessary by the qualified
211 practitioner;
212 (X) A description of the proposed contact, including the
213 location, frequency, duration, and supervisory arrangement;
214 (XI) The child's preference and relative comfort level
215 with the proposed contact, when age-appropriate;
216 (XII) The parent's or legal guardian's preference
217 regarding the proposed contact; and
218 (XIII) The qualified practitioner's opinion, along with
219 the basis for that opinion, as to whether the proposed contact
220 would likely pose significant risk of emotional or physical harm
221 to the child.
222
223 The written report of the assessment must be given to the
224 commission.
225 b. A recommendation made as a part of the risk-assessment
Page 9 of 16
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb45-00

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
HB 45 2026
226 report as to whether supervised contact with the child should be
227 approved;
228 c. A written consent signed by the child's parent or legal
229 guardian, if the parent or legal guardian is not the sex
230 offender, agreeing to the sex offender having supervised contact
231 with the child after receiving full disclosure of the sex
232 offender's present legal status, past criminal history, and the
233 results of the risk assessment. The commission may not approve
234 contact with the child if the parent or legal guardian refuses
235 to give written consent for supervised contact;
236 d. A safety plan prepared by the qualified practitioner,
237 who provides treatment to the offender, in collaboration with
238 the sex offender, the child's parent or legal guardian, and the
239 child, when age appropriate, which details the acceptable
240 conditions of contact between the sex offender and the child.
241 The safety plan must be reviewed and approved by the Department
242 of Corrections before being submitted to the commission; and
243 e. Evidence that the child's parent or legal guardian, if
244 the parent or legal guardian is not the sex offender,
245 understands the need for and agrees to the safety plan and has
246 agreed to provide, or to designate another adult to provide,
247 constant supervision any time the child is in contact with the
248 offender.
249
250 The commission may not appoint a person to conduct a risk
Page 10 of 16
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb45-00

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
HB 45 2026
251 assessment and may not accept a risk assessment from a person
252 who has not demonstrated to the commission that he or she has
253 met the requirements of a qualified practitioner as defined in
254 this section.
255 6. If the victim was under age 18, a prohibition on
256 working for pay or as a volunteer at any school, child care
257 facility, park, playground, public swimming pool, public bathing
258 place, or other place where children regularly congregate, as
259 prescribed by the commission.
260 7. Unless otherwise indicated in the treatment plan
261 provided by a qualified practitioner in the sexual offender
262 treatment program, a prohibition on viewing, owning, or
263 possessing any obscene, pornographic, or sexually stimulating
264 visual or auditory material, including telephone, electronic
265 media, computer programs, or computer services that are relevant
266 to the offender's deviant behavior pattern.
267 8. Effective for a releasee whose crime is committed on or
268 after July 1, 2005, a prohibition on accessing the Internet or
269 other computer services until a qualified practitioner in the
270 offender's sex offender treatment program, after a risk
271 assessment is completed, approves and implements a safety plan
272 for the offender's accessing or using the Internet or other
273 computer services.
274 9. A requirement that the releasee must submit two
275 specimens of blood to the Department of Law Enforcement to be
Page 11 of 16
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb45-00

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
HB 45 2026
276 registered with the DNA database.
277 10. A requirement that the releasee make restitution to
278 the victim, as determined by the sentencing court or the
279 commission, for all necessary medical and related professional
280 services relating to physical, psychiatric, and psychological
281 care.
282 11. Submission to a warrantless search by the community
283 control or probation officer of the probationer's or community
284 controllee's person, residence, or vehicle.
285 (12) In addition to all other conditions imposed, for a
286 releasee who is subject to conditional release for a crime that
287 was committed on or after May 26, 2010, and who has been
288 convicted at any time of committing, or attempting, soliciting,
289 or conspiring to commit, any of the criminal offenses listed in
290 s. 943.0435(1)(h)1.a.(I), or a similar offense in another
291 jurisdiction against a victim who was under 18 years of age at
292 the time of the offense, if the releasee has not received a
293 pardon for any felony or similar law of another jurisdiction
294 necessary for the operation of this subsection, if a conviction
295 of a felony or similar law of another jurisdiction necessary for
296 the operation of this subsection has not been set aside in any
297 postconviction proceeding, or if the releasee has not been
298 removed from the requirement to register as a sexual offender or
299 sexual predator pursuant to s. 943.04354, the commission must
300 impose the following conditions:
Page 12 of 16
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb45-00

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
HB 45 2026
301 (a) A prohibition on visiting schools, child care
302 facilities, parks, public swimming pools, public bathing places,
303 and playgrounds without prior approval from the releasee's
304 supervising officer. The commission may also designate
305 additional prohibited locations to protect a victim. The
306 prohibition ordered under this paragraph does not prohibit the
307 releasee from visiting a school, child care facility, park,
308 public swimming pool, public bathing place, or playground for
309 the sole purpose of attending a religious service as defined in
310 s. 775.0861 or picking up or dropping off the releasee's child
311 or grandchild at a child care facility or school.
312 Section 6. Subsections (9) though (13) of section 948.001,
313 Florida Statutes, are renumbered as subsections (11) through
314 (15), respectively, and new subsections (9) and (10) are added
315 to that section, to read:
316 948.001 Definitions.—As used in this chapter, the term:
317 (9) "Public bathing place" has the same meaning as
318 provided in s. 514.011(4).
319 (10) "Public swimming pool" has the same meaning as
320 provided in s. 514.011(2)
321 Section 7. Paragraphs (b) and (f) of subsection (1) and
322 paragraph (a) of subsection (4) of section 948.30, Florida
323 Statutes, are amended to read:
324 948.30 Additional terms and conditions of probation or
325 community control for certain sex offenses.—Conditions imposed
Page 13 of 16
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb45-00

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
HB 45 2026
326 pursuant to this section do not require oral pronouncement at
327 the time of sentencing and shall be considered standard
328 conditions of probation or community control for offenders
329 specified in this section.
330 (1) Effective for probationers or community controllees
331 whose crime was committed on or after October 1, 1995, and who
332 are placed under supervision for a violation of chapter 794, s.
333 800.04, s. 827.071, s. 847.0135(5), or s. 847.0145, or whose
334 crime was committed on or after July 1, 2021, and who are placed
335 under supervision for a violation of s. 787.06(3)(b), (d), (f),
336 or (g), or whose crime was committed on or after July 1, 2023,
337 and who are placed under supervision for attempting, soliciting,
338 or conspiring to commit a violation of s. 787.06(3)(b), (d),
339 (f), or (g); chapter 794; s. 800.04; s. 827.071; s. 847.0135(5);
340 or s. 847.0145, the court must impose the following conditions
341 in addition to all other standard and special conditions
342 imposed:
343 (b) If the victim was under the age of 18, a prohibition
344 on living within 1,000 feet of a school, child care facility,
345 park, playground, public swimming pool, public bathing place, or
346 other place where children regularly congregate, as prescribed
347 by the court. The 1,000-foot distance shall be measured in a
348 straight line from the offender's place of residence to the
349 nearest boundary line of the school, child care facility, park,
350 playground, public swimming pool, public bathing place, or other
Page 14 of 16
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb45-00

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
HB 45 2026
351 place where children congregate. The distance may not be
352 measured by a pedestrian route or automobile route. A
353 probationer or community controllee who is subject to this
354 paragraph may not be forced to relocate and does not violate his
355 or her probation or community control if he or she is living in
356 a residence that meets the requirements of this paragraph and a
357 school, child care facility, park, playground, public swimming
358 pool, public bathing place, or other place where children
359 regularly congregate is subsequently established within 1,000
360 feet of his or her residence.
361 (f) If the victim was under age 18, a prohibition on
362 working for pay or as a volunteer at any place where children
363 regularly congregate, including, but not limited to, schools,
364 child care facilities, parks, playgrounds, public swimming
365 pools, public bathing places, pet stores, libraries, zoos, theme
366 parks, and malls.
367 (4) In addition to all other conditions imposed, for a
368 probationer or community controllee who is subject to
369 supervision for a crime that was committed on or after May 26,
370 2010, and who has been convicted at any time of committing, or
371 attempting, soliciting, or conspiring to commit, any of the
372 criminal offenses listed in s. 943.0435(1)(h)1.a.(I), or a
373 similar offense in another jurisdiction, against a victim who
374 was under the age of 18 at the time of the offense; if the
375 offender has not received a pardon for any felony or similar law
Page 15 of 16
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb45-00

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
HB 45 2026
376 of another jurisdiction necessary for the operation of this
377 subsection, if a conviction of a felony or similar law of
378 another jurisdiction necessary for the operation of this
379 subsection has not been set aside in any postconviction
380 proceeding, or if the offender has not been removed from the
381 requirement to register as a sexual offender or sexual predator
382 pursuant to s. 943.04354, the court must impose the following
383 conditions:
384 (a) A prohibition on visiting schools, child care
385 facilities, parks, public swimming pools, public bathing places,
386 and playgrounds, without prior approval from the offender's
387 supervising officer. The court may also designate additional
388 locations to protect a victim. The prohibition ordered under
389 this paragraph does not prohibit the offender from visiting a
390 school, child care facility, park, public swimming pool, public
391 bathing place, or playground for the sole purpose of attending a
392 religious service as defined in s. 775.0861 or picking up or
393 dropping off the offender's children or grandchildren at a child
394 care facility or school.
395 Section 8. This act shall take effect July 1, 2026.
Page 16 of 16
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb45-00